New Jersey, session 221, S685.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Consumer Freedom From Unwanted Expense in Health Insurance Coverage Act. 2.    As used in this act: Foreign health insurer means an insurer licensed to sell individual health benefits plans in any other state in the United States. Individual health benefits plan means a benefits plan for persons and their dependents which pays or provides for hospital and medical expense benefits for covered services. Resident means a person whose primary residence is in New Jersey and who is present in New Jersey for at least six months of the calendar year. 3.    Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a resident shall have the right to purchase a health insurance policy legally sold by a foreign health insurer.  An employer shall have the right to reimburse its employees for the costs of health insurance coverage purchased pursuant to this act. The purchase of health insurance coverage pursuant to this act shall satisfy any legal obligation for an individual to maintain health insurance coverage imposed by any entity having the right to require that coverage be maintained. 4.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.